Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.408

Alternative public works contracting procedures—Repeal.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1970.SL) ***

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2032:

(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2023 c 395 s 4, 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 1;

(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2023 c 395 s 5, 2021 c 230 s 1, 2019 c 212 s 1, 2014 c 42 s 1, & 2013 c 222 s 1;

(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2023 c 395 s 6, 2021 c 230 s 2, 2013 c 222 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 102, & 2005 c 377 s 1;

(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2023 c 395 s 7, 2021 c 230 s 3, 2013 c 222 s 3, 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009 c 75 s 1, 2007 c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;

(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2023 c 395 s 8, 2021 c 230 s 4, 2013 c 222 s 4, & 2007 c 494 s 104;

(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2021 c 230 s 5, 2019 c 212 s 2, 2013 c 222 s 5, 2009 c 75 s 2, & 2007 c 494 s 105;

(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2013 c 222 s 6 & 2007 c 494 s 106;

(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2019 c 212 s 3, 2017 c 211 s 1, 2013 c 222 s 7, 2009 c 75 s 3, & 2007 c 494 s 107;

(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2014 c 42 s 2, 2013 c 222 s 8, & 2007 c 494 s 108;

(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;

(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2021 c 230 s 6, 2019 c 212 s 4, 2013 c 222 s 9, 2009 c 75 s 4, & 2007 c 494 s 201;

(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2019 c 212 s 5, 2013 c 222 s 10, 2007 c 494 s 203, & 1994 c 132 s 7;

(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2023 c 395 s 9, 2021 c 230 s 7, 2019 c 212 s 6, 2014 c 19 s 1, 2013 c 222 s 11, 2009 c 75 s 5, & 2007 c 494 s 204;

(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2014 c 42 s 3, 2013 c 222 s 12, & 2007 c 494 s 301;

(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2021 c 230 s 8, 2014 c 42 s 4, & 2007 c 494 s 302;

(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2023 c 395 s 10, 2021 c 230 s 9, 2014 c 42 s 5, 2013 c 222 s 13, 2009 c 75 s 6, & 2007 c 494 s 303;

(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2021 c 230 s 10, 2014 c 42 s 6, & 2007 c 494 s 304;

(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2023 c 395 s 11, 2021 c 230 s 11, 2013 c 222 s 14, & 2007 c 494 s 305;

(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2023 c 395 s 12, 2021 c 230 s 12, 2013 c 222 s 15, & 2010 c 163 s 1;

(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2021 c 230 s 13, 2014 c 42 s 7, 2013 c 222 s 16, & 2007 c 494 s 306;

(21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2021 c 230 s 14, 2013 c 222 s 17, & 2007 c 494 s 307;

(22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;

(23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2019 c 212 s 7, 2017 c 136 s 1, & 2016 c 52 s 1;

(24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2021 c 230 s 15, 2019 c 212 s 8, & 2007 c 494 s 402;

(25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2021 c 230 s 16, 2019 c 212 s 9, 2015 c 173 s 1, 2013 c 222 s 19, & 2007 c 494 s 403;

(26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2019 c 212 s 10, 2012 c 102 s 2, & 2007 c 494 s 404;

(27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2021 c 230 s 17, 2012 c 102 s 3, & 2007 c 494 s 405;

(28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2019 c 212 s 11, 2014 c 19 s 2, 2005 c 274 s 275, & 1994 c 132 s 10;

(29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;

(30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2021 c 230 s 18, 2013 c 222 s 20, 2007 c 494 s 501, & 2001 c 328 s 5;

(31) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;

(32) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;

(33) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510;

(34) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512;

(35) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513; and

(36) RCW 39.10.908 and 2023 c 395 s 13 and 2021 c 230 s 19.

[ 2023 c 395 s 36; 2021 c 230 s 22; 2019 c 212 s 13. Prior: 2017 c 211 s 2; 2017 c 136 s 2; prior: 2014 c 42 s 8; 2014 c 19 s 3; prior: 2013 c 222 s 22; 2013 c 186 s 2; 2012 c 102 s 4; 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 5; 2007 c 494 s 507.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 39.10.200.

Part headings and captions not law—Effective dates—Severability—2007 c 494: See RCW 39.10.903 through 39.10.905.